src/main/resources/Dict-en/hyph_en_US.xml
<?xml version="1.0" encoding="utf-8"?>
<hyphenation-patterns>
    <hyphenation-info>
        <languages>
            <language>en</language>
            <country>US</country>
        </languages>
        <hyphen-char value="-"/>
        <left-hyphen-min value="2"/>
        <right-hyphen-min value="2"/>
    </hyphenation-info>
    <patterns>
.ach4
.ad4der
.af1t
.al3t
.am5at
.an5c
.ang4
.ani5m
.ant4
.an3te
.an3ti
.ar5c
.ar4ch
.as3c
.as1p
.as1t
.at3t
.av4id
.aw4f
.be3c
.be1g
.be3s
.be3t
.bi5o
.bl3
.bo5s
.br2
.bu3t
.bu5ti
.ca3p
.ca1t
.cen4
.ch4
.co3n
.con3c
.con4f
.con3t
.cr3
.da4m
.de1c
.de3g
.de3l
.de3m
.de3n
.de3p
.de3r
.de3s
.de3t
.de3v
.di3a
.di3c
.di3f
.di3g
.di3m
.di3r
.di3s
.di3v
.do5c
.dr3
.du3c
.du4k
.du4l
.ea3t
.eb4
.ec3
.ed3
.ef3
.el3e
.em3
.en3c
.en3d
.en3g
.en3j
.en3q
.en3r
.en3s
.en3t
.ep3
.eq3
.er3
.es3
.et3
.ev3
.ex1
.ex3c
.ex3p
.ex3t
.fa3
.fi2
.fl3
.fo3
.fr3
.ga3
.ge3
.gl3
.gr3
.ha3
.he3
.hi3
.ho3
.hy3ph
.id3
.ig3
.il4
.im3
.in3
.in3c
.in3d
.in3f
.in3g
.in3h
.in3j
.in3k
.in3l
.in3m
.in3n
.in3p
.in3q
.in3r
.in3s
.in3t
.in3v
.ir3
.is3
.it3
.iv3
.ju3
.ka3
.ke3
.ki3
.kn3
.la3
.le3
.li3
.lo3
.lu3
.ma3
.me3
.mi3
.mo3
.mu3
.na3
.ne3
.ni3
.no3
.nu3
.ob3
.oc3
.od3
.of3
.ol3
.om3
.on3
.op3
.or3
.os3
.ot3
.ou3
.ov3
.ow3
.ox3
.pa3
.pe3
.ph3
.pi3
.pl3
.po3
.pr3
.pu3
.qu3
.ra3
.re3
.rh3
.ri3
.ro3
.ru3
.sa3
.sc3
.se3
.sh3
.si3
.sk3
.sl3
.sm3
.sn3
.so3
.sp3
.sq3
.st3
.su3
.sw3
.sy3
.ta3
.te3
.th3
.ti3
.to3
.tr3
.tu3
.tw3
.ty3
.un3
.up3
.ur3
.us3
.ut3
.va3
.ve3
.vi3
.vo3
.vu3
.wa3
.we3
.wh3
.wi3
.wo3
.wr3
.wu3
.xa3
.xe3
.xi3
.xo3
.xu3
.ya3
.ye3
.yi3
.yo3
.yu3
.za3
.ze3
.zi3
.zo3
.zu3
1ba
1da
1ga
1la
1ma
1na
1pa
1ra
1sa
1ta
1va
1za
1bb
1bc
1bd
1bf
1bg
1bh
1bj
1bk
1bl
1bm
1bn
1bp
1bq
1br
1bs
1bt
1bv
1bw
1bx
1by
1bz
1cb
1cc
1cd
1cf
1cg
1ch
1cj
1ck
1cl
1cm
1cn
1cp
1cq
1cr
1cs
1ct
1cv
1cw
1cx
1cy
1cz
1db
1dc
1dd
1df
1dg
1dh
1dj
1dk
1dl
1dm
1dn
1dp
1dq
1dr
1ds
1dt
1dv
1dw
1dx
1dy
1dz
1fb
1fc
1fd
1ff
1fg
1fh
1fj
1fk
1fl
1fm
1fn
1fp
1fq
1fr
1fs
1ft
1fv
1fw
1fx
1fy
1fz
1gb
1gc
1gd
1gf
1gg
1gh
1gj
1gk
1gl
1gm
1gn
1gp
1gq
1gr
1gs
1gt
1gv
1gw
1gx
1gy
1gz
1hb
1hc
1hd
1hf
1hg
1hh
1hj
1hk
1hl
1hm
1hn
1hp
1hq
1hr
1hs
1ht
1hv
1hw
1hx
1hy
1hz
1jb
1jc
1jd
1jf
1jg
1jh
1jj
1jk
1jl
1jm
1jn
1jp
1jq
1jr
1js
1jt
1jv
1jw
1jx
1jy
1jz
1kb
1kc
1kd
1kf
1kg
1kh
1kj
1kk
1kl
1km
1kn
1kp
1kq
1kr
1ks
1kt
1kv
1kw
1kx
1ky
1kz
1lb
1lc
1ld
1lf
1lg
1lh
1lj
1lk
1ll
1lm
1ln
1lp
1lq
1lr
1ls
1lt
1lv
1lw
1lx
1ly
1lz
1mb
1mc
1md
1mf
1mg
1mh
1mj
1mk
1ml
1mm
1mn
1mp
1mq
1mr
1ms
1mt
1mv
1mw
1mx
1my
1mz
1nb
1nc
1nd
1nf
1ng
1nh
1nj
1nk
1nl
1nm
1nn
1np
1nq
1nr
1ns
1nt
1nv
1nw
1nx
1ny
1nz
1pb
1pc
1pd
1pf
1pg
1ph
1pj
1pk
1pl
1pm
1pn
1pp
1pq
1pr
1ps
1pt
1pv
1pw
1px
1py
1pz
1qb
1qc
1qd
1qf
1qg
1qh
1qj
1qk
1ql
1qm
1qn
1qp
1qq
1qr
1qs
1qt
1qv
1qw
1qx
1qy
1qz
1rb
1rc
1rd
1rf
1rg
1rh
1rj
1rk
1rl
1rm
1rn
1rp
1rq
1rr
1rs
1rt
1rv
1rw
1rx
1ry
1rz
1sb
1sc
1sd
1sf
1sg
1sh
1sj
1sk
1sl
1sm
1sn
1sp
1sq
1sr
1ss
1st
1sv
1sw
1sx
1sy
1sz
1tb
1tc
1td
1tf
1tg
1th
1tj
1tk
1tl
1tm
1tn
1tp
1tq
1tr
1ts
1tt
1tv
1tw
1tx
1ty
1tz
1vb
1vc
1vd
1vf
1vg
1vh
1vj
1vk
1vl
1vm
1vn
1vp
1vq
1vr
1vs
1vt
1vv
1vw
1vx
1vy
1vz
1wb
1wc
1wd
1wf
1wg
1wh
1wj
1wk
1wl
1wm
1wn
1wp
1wq
1wr
1ws
1wt
1wv
1ww
1wx
1wy
1wz
1xb
1xc
1xd
1xf
1xg
1xh
1xj
1xk
1xl
1xm
1xn
1xp
1xq
1xr
1xs
1xt
1xv
1xw
1xx
1xy
1xz
1yb
1yc
1yd
1yf
1yg
1yh
1yj
1yk
1yl
1ym
1yn
1yp
1yq
1yr
1ys
1yt
1yv
1yw
1yx
1yy
1yz
1zb
1zc
1zd
1zf
1zg
1zh
1zj
1zk
1zl
1zm
1zn
1zp
1zq
1zr
1zs
1zt
1zv
1zw
1zx
1zy
1zz
    </patterns>
</hyphenation-patterns>
